Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-302
Conditions; procedure.

Whenever the county board of any county, the city council of any city, the board of trustees of any village, or the school board of any school district, shall be satisfied by petition or otherwise, that any such county, precinct, township or town, city, village or school district, is unable to pay in full its indebtedness, and one-third of the resident freeholders of such county, precinct, township or town, city, village or school district shall by petition ask that such county, precinct, township or town, city, village or school district compromise such indebtedness, it is hereby required to enter into negotiations with the owner or owners, holder or holders of any such indebtedness, of whatever form, for scaling, discounting or compromising the same.

Laws 1903, c. 10, § 2, p. 63;

R.S.1913, § 401;

C.S.1922, § 318;

C.S.1929, § 11-302;

R.S.1943, § 10-302.